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DTC P 1215/97EDUCircuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
TheEDUdrives thespill control valveathighspeeds.TheEDU’shigh −speeddrivingunderhigh fuelpres-
sureconditions isachieved through theuseofaDC/DCconverter thatprovidesahigh −voltage,quick −
charging system.
The engine ECU constantly monitors the EDU and stops the engine in case an abnormal condition is de-
tected.
Thebatteryvoltage is increasedby theDC/DCconverter.Avoltageofapproximately 150V isapplied to the
spill control valve in accordance with the IJ+ signal received from the engine ECU. At this time, the injection
verification signal (IJF) is sent to the engine ECU.

DTC No. DTC Detection condition Trouble Area

AlthhSPVD i t t t EDU ith i dt 500
SOpenorshort inEDUcircuit

P1215/97
AlthoughSPVDisoutput toEDUwithenginespeedat500 rpm

or moreSPVF is not input continuously 5 times or more

SOpen orshort in EDU circuit
SEDUP1215/97

ormore,SPVF isnot inputcontinuously5 timesormore
EDU
SSpill control valve
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check voltage between terminal 2 of wire harness side connector and body
ground.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the EDU connector.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure the voltage between terminal 2 of wire harness side
connector and body ground.
OK:

Voltage: 10 to 14 V

NG Check Spill valve relay circuit
(See page DI−1 57).

OK

2 Check resistance EDU ground bolt and body ground.

NG Tighten EDU ground bolt.

OK

3 Check resistance between terminals 4 and 5 of wire harness side connector.

CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals 4 and 5 of wire harness
side connector.
OK:

Resistance:Approx. 1.7 �

OKGotostep5.

NG
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4Checkspill controlvalve (SeePubNo.RM6 17E,pageFU −113).

NG Check and replace injection pump
(SeePubNo.RM6 17E,pageFU −113).

OK

Check for open and short in harness and connector between spill control valve and EDU
(See page IN−1 9) .

5 Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
EDU (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

6 Check voltage between terminal SPVD of engine ECU connector and body
ground.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure the voltage between terminal SPVD of the engine
ECU connector and body ground.
OK:

Voltage: Approx. 0 V

Reference: INSPECTIONUSINGOSCILLOSCOPE
During idling, check the waveform between terminals SPVD
andE 1 of theengineECU.
HINT:
The correct waveform is as shown.

NGCheckandreplaceengineECU
(See page IN−1 9) .
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OK

7 Check voltage between terminal SPVF of engine ECU and body ground.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure the voltage between terminals SPVF of the engine
ECU and body ground.
OK:

Voltage: 9 to 14 V

Reference: INSPECTION USING OSCILLOSCOPE
During idling, check the waveform between terminals SPVF
and E1 of the engine ECU.
HINT:
The correct waveform is as shown.

NG Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .

OK

Check and replace EDU (See Pub No.
RM617E, page ED−15).


